Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-1306
Medical Debt Relief Fund; created; use; investment.

The Medical Debt Relief Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer and shall be used to carry out the Medical Debt Relief Act. The fund shall consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 48.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.